Maryland, session 2026, HB0896.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
13–220.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE NATIONAL GUARD STATE
ACTIVE DUTY MOBILIZATION FUND.
(B) THERE IS A NATIONAL GUARD STATE ACTIVE DUTY MOBILIZATION
FUND IN THE OFFICE OF THE ADJUTANT GENERAL WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PAY FOR PERSONNEL AND
EQUIPMENT FOR STATE ACTIVE DUTY MOBILIZATION OF THE NATIONAL GUARD, AS
ORDERED BY THE GOVERNOR.
(D) THE ADJUTANT GENERAL SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(E) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
– 1 –

Ch. 481 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND; AND
(2) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(G) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR THE EXPENSES OF AND TO SUPPORT
THE OPERATIONS OF THE NATIONAL GUARD IN STATE ACTIVE DUTY STATUS.
(H) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND IN
THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(I) ANY INVESTMENT EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO THE
GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
(J) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(K) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND FOR STATE ACTIVE DUTY
MOBILIZATION OF THE NATIONAL GUARD IS SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND IS NOT
INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE WOULD BE
APPROPRIATED FOR STATE ACTIVE DUTY MOBILIZATION OF THE NATIONAL GUARD.
(L) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND SHALL BE REPLENISHED IN A
TIMELY MANNER TO MAINTAIN THE OPERATIONAL EFFECTIVENESS OF FUTURE
STATE ACTIVE DUTY MOBILIZATIONS OF THE NATIONAL GUARD.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 2 –